District of Columbia statutes.
38-1271.02

Transition plan for independent Community College of the District of Columbia.

(a)

The President and Chairman of the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia (“UDC”), the President of the Community College of the District of Columbia (“CCDC”), and the University of the District of Columbia Community College Transition to Independence Advisory Board, shall jointly develop and submit to the Council by no later than November 28, 2011, a transition plan for establishing CCDC as an independent community college.

(b)

The transition plan shall:

(1)

Identify all actions that must be taken for CCDC to operate independently from the UDC flagship university, including the creation of an independent board of trustees for CCDC;

(2)

Account for the type and scope of programs offered and envisioned, and include the development, expansion, integration, coordination, and efficient use of the facilities; and

(3)

Include the following:

(A)

An independent budget for CCDC that shall identify, for the first 5 years of operation as an independent entity, beginning in fiscal year 2013, the expected costs and revenues associated with its operation;

(B)

The CCDC’s application for accreditation by the Middle States Commission on Higher Education;

(C)

The Draft Terms of Articulation, which shall contain all proposed policies related to the transfer of credits and admission policies between CCDC and UDC, and which may be updated from time to time;

(D)

A Workforce and Local Education Plan, which shall identify potential arrangements to provide training for both public and private sector employees, and which shall identify mechanisms by which to increase cooperation and interaction with the District of Columbia Public Schools, public charter schools, and other District agencies; and

(E)

A plan detailing any transfers of positions, employees, property, and funds from UDC to CCDC for the purposes of establishing an independent community college.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 4703, 58 DCR 6226